tests/verbs-misc.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    App:  hfst-optimised-lookup
    Gen:  ../tur.autogen.hfst
    Morph:  ../tur.automorf.hfst

Tests:

 "[twol] {t} -> d":
    et<v><tv><pass><cont><p3><sg> : ediliyor

 "[twol] Vowel deletion in verb stems before -{I}yor":
    oyna<v><tv><pastcnt><p1><sg> : oynuyordum

 "[lexc] Passives": 
    yap<v><tv><pass><fut><p3><sg> : yapılacak
    yap<v><tv><pass><past><p3><sg> : yapıldı
    yap<v><tv><pass><evid><p3><sg> : yapılmış

 "[lexc] Causatives in -{D}{I}r":
    yap<v><tv><caus><fut><p3><sg> : yaptıracak

 "[lexc] Regular verb tenses":

    al<v><tv><pastcnt><p1><sg> : alıyordum
    al<v><tv><evidp><p1><sg> : almıştım
    al<v><tv><condcnt><p1><sg> : alıyorsam    
    al<v><tv><evidcnt><p1><sg> : alıyormuşum
    
    gel<v><iv><fut><p1><sg> : geleceğim
    gel<v><iv><fut><p3><frm><sg> : gelecektir
    gel<v><iv><fut><p3><sg> : gelecek
    gel<v><iv><futp><p1><sg> : gelecektim
    gel<v><iv><futc><p1><sg> : geleceksem
    gel<v><iv><fute><p1><sg> : gelecekmişim
    
    gel<v><iv><aor><p1><sg> : gelirim
    ol<v><iv><aor><p3><sg> : olur
    ol<v><iv><neg><aor><p3><sg> : olmaz
    gel<v><iv><aorp><p1><sg> : gelirdim
    gel<v><iv><aorcond><p1><sg> : gelirsem
    
    yağ<v><iv><evid><p3><sg> : yağmış
    gel<v><iv><evid><p3><frm><sg> : gelmiştir
    gel<v><iv><evid><p1><sg> : gelmişim
    gel<v><iv><evidp><p1><sg> : gelmiştim
    
    gel<v><iv><evidc><p1><sg> : gelmişsem    
    gel<v><iv><nece><p1><sg> : gelmeliyim
    gel<v><iv><past><p1><sg> : geldim
    gel<v><iv><pastc><p1><sg> : geldiysem 
    gel<v><iv><cond><p1><sg> : gelsem
    gel<v><iv><condp><p1><sg> : gelseydim
    gel<v><iv><exh><p1><sg> : geleyim
    gel<v><iv><imperp><p1><sg> : gelmekteydim
